apertium-da-nb.da.dix
<pardef n="him/mel__n"> <!-- PT: autoconcord möjlig?? -->
  <e a="PT"><p><l>mlens</l>     <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mel</l>       <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>lar</l>       <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ind"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>len</l>       <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e r="LR" c="style:sol"><p><l>melen</l><r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>larna</l>     <r>mel<s n="n"/><s n="ut"/><s n="pl"/><s n="def"/></r></p><par n="S__case"/></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="b/inde__vblex">
  <e a="PT"><p><l>inde</l>      <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inde</l>      <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>inder</l>     <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>indes</l>     <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>andt</l>      <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>undet</l>     <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>indende</l>   <r>inde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="fl/yde__vblex">
  <e a="PT"><p><l>yde</l>       <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yde</l>       <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p><par n="S__voice"/></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yder</l>      <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ydes</l>      <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/><s n="pasv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ød</l>        <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="actv"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ydt</l>       <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ydende</l>    <r>yde<s n="vblex"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
  </pardefs>

<e lm="himmel" a="PT">   <i>him</i><par n="him/mel__n"/></e>
<e lm="binde" a="MLO">   <i>b</i><par n="b/inde__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="flyde" a="MLO">   <i>flyd</i><par n="fl/yde__vblex"/></e>
